Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 49. Enterprise Zone Grant Program.

§ 59.1-538.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Enterprise Zone Grant Act.”

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

The number of this chapter
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2005 act having been 47.

The numbers for the sections
contained in this chapter, §§ 59.1-538 through 59.1-549, were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2005 act having been §§ 59.1-530 through 59.1-541.

Cross references.

As to regulation of the Enterprise Zone Grant Program by the Department of Housing and Community Development, see 13 VAC 5-112-10 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 59.1-539.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board” means the Board of Housing and Community Development.

“Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

“Enterprise zone” means an area declared by the Governor to be eligible for the benefits of this chapter.

“Local zone administrator” means the chief executive of the county or city in which the enterprise zone is located, or his designee.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

§ 59.1-540.
Administration.

The Department shall administer this chapter and shall have the following powers and duties:

To establish the criteria for determining what areas qualify as enterprise zones. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the distress criteria specified in § 59.1-545;

To monitor the implementation and operation of this chapter;

To evaluate and report on the Enterprise Zone Program;

To administer, enforce, and interpret the regulations promulgated by the Board; and

To allocate grant funds in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

§ 59.1-541.
Rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations prescribing procedures implementing the purpose of this chapter shall be promulgated by the Board in accordance with the Administrative Process Act.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

§ 59.1-542.
Enterprise zone designation.

Upon the Department’s announcement of periodic zone designation competitions, the governing body of any county or city may make written application to the Department to have an area or areas declared an enterprise zone. Such application shall include
a description of the area or areas to be included, the development potential of these areas, the need for special state incentives, the local incentives that shall be provided to support new economic activity, and other information
that the Department deems necessary to assess requests for designation.

Two or more adjacent localities may file a joint application for an enterprise zone. Localities applying for a joint zone shall demonstrate a regional need for an enterprise zone and a regional impact that could not be achieved through a single jurisdiction
zone. Applicants for a joint zone shall also specify what mechanisms will be used to ensure that the economic benefits of such a zone are shared among the applicant localities.

An enterprise zone may consist of no more than three noncontiguous areas. The aggregate size of these noncontiguous zone areas shall be as follows:

For cities, the minimum size of an enterprise zone shall be one-quarter square mile and the maximum size of an enterprise zone shall be one square mile or seven percent of the jurisdiction’s land area or an area that includes seven percent of the population,
whichever is largest.

For towns designated as enterprise zones under former §§ 59.1-272 through 59.1-278, 59.1-279.1, or 59.1-280.2 through 59.1-284 of the Enterprise Zone Act (§ 59.1-270 et seq.), the size of an enterprise zone shall conform to the size requirements for cities
in subdivision 1.

For unincorporated areas of counties, the minimum size of an enterprise zone shall be one-half square mile and the maximum size of an enterprise zone shall be six square miles.

For consolidated cities the enterprise zones in cities for which the boundaries were created through the consolidation of a city and county or the consolidation of two cities, the enterprise zone shall conform substantially to the size requirements for
unincorporated areas of counties in subdivision 3.In no instance shall a zone consist only of a site for a single business firm. Localities shall be limited to three enterprise zone designations.

A joint enterprise zone shall consist of no more than three noncontiguous zone areas for each participating locality. The aggregate size of these noncontiguous areas shall be specified by regulation.

Upon recommendation of the Director of the Department, the Governor may designate up to 30 enterprise zones in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Such designations are to be done in coordination with the expiration of existing zones designated
under earlier Enterprise Zone Program provisions. The initial round of six zone designation applications and approval may be conducted prior to adoption of final program regulations provided that the process is consistent with
the provisions of this chapter. Enterprise zones shall be designated for an initial 10-year period except as provided for in subsections A and B of § 59.1-546. Upon recommendation of the Director of the Department, the Governor
may renew zones designated on or after July 1, 2005, for up to three five-year renewal periods and zones designated prior to July 1, 2005, for one five-year renewal period. Recommendations for five-year renewals shall be based
on the locality’s performance of its enterprise zone responsibilities, the continued need for such a zone, and its effectiveness in creating jobs and capital investment.

Localities that have zone designations are responsible for providing the local incentives specified in their applications, providing timely submission of enterprise zone reports and evaluations as required by regulation, verifying that businesses and
properties seeking enterprise zone incentives are physically located within their zones, and implementing an active local enterprise zone program within the context of overall economic development efforts.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884; 2018, c. 315; 2019, cc. 119, 496.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 315, in subsection C, substituted “as follows” for “specified by regulation” in the introductory paragraph; added subdivisions C 1 through C 4; and inserted the first sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 119 and 496 are identical, and substituted “zones designated on or after July 1, 2005, for up to three five-year renewal periods and zones designated prior to July 1, 2005, for one five-year renewal period” for “zones for up
to two five-year renewal periods” in subsection E.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reversion of city. —

A county may establish a local enterprise zone development taxation program in an enterprise zone located in a town within the county, where the town was a city when the enterprise zone was first established, and the city has since reverted to the status
of a town. See opinion of Attorney General to Patrick J. Skelley II, Esquire, Bedford County Attorney, 16-026, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 29 (11/17/16).

§ 59.1-543.
Local incentives.

Local governments submitting applications for enterprise zone designation shall propose local incentives that address the economic conditions within their locality and that will help stimulate real property improvements and new job creation. Such local
incentives include, but are not limited to: (i) reduction of permit fees; (ii) reduction of user fees; (iii) reduction of business, professional and occupational license tax; (iv) partial exemption from taxation of substantially
rehabilitated real estate pursuant to §

58.1-3221

; and (v) adoption of a local enterprise zone development taxation program pursuant to Article 4.2 (§

58.1-3245.6

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1. The extent and duration of such incentives shall conform to the requirements of the Constitution of Virginia and the Constitution of the United States. In making application
for designation as an enterprise zone, the application may also contain proposals for regulatory flexibility, including but not limited to: (a) special zoning districts, (b) permit process reform, (c) exemptions from local ordinances,
and (d) other public incentives proposed in the locality’s application which shall be binding upon the locality upon designation of the enterprise zone.

A locality may establish eligibility criteria for local incentives that differ from the criteria required to qualify for the incentives provided in this chapter.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

§ 59.1-544.
Amendment of enterprise zones; redesignation of certain joint enterprise zones.

Once an enterprise zone has been designated, the local government may make written application to the Department to amend the zone boundaries in accordance with the requirements of § 59.1-542. Such boundary amendments are subject to Department approval.
Any amendment to an enterprise zone that includes the elimination of an area or areas from a zone shall not exceed the maximum size provisions of subsection C of § 59.1-542 and shall be reviewed by the Department with the potential
impact on affected businesses and property owners given primary consideration. Local governing bodies may amend their local enterprise zone incentives with the approval of the Department provided that the proposed incentive is
equal to or superior to that in the original application or any previous amendment approved by the Department.

The Department may redesignate an existing joint enterprise zone consisting of two localities for the purpose of expanding the zone provided (i) all of the local governing bodies of the localities in which the proposed redesignated zone will be located
have submitted to the Department resolutions supporting the proposed redesignation and applications for redesignation of the joint enterprise zone and (ii) the area of the locality added to the redesignated zone is contiguous to
the existing joint enterprise zone and includes a revenue-sharing district that has experienced the loss of 900 permanent full-time positions within a 12-month period.

When a county or city was previously added to an existing enterprise zone to create a joint enterprise zone, the Department shall redesignate the enterprise zone when the term of the joint enterprise zone expires. The duration of the enterprise zone redesignated
pursuant to this subsection shall be equal to the length of time the original enterprise zone existed before the county or city was added to create the joint enterprise zone.

As used in this section, “joint enterprise zone” means an enterprise zone located in two or more adjacent localities.

Any redesignation of an existing joint enterprise zone shall be in compliance with all applicable regulations promulgated by the Department.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884; 2011, cc. 254, 310; 2013, c. 514; 2018, c. 315.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 254 and 310 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 514 added subsection C and the subsection D and E designators, and substituted “section” for “subsection” in subsection D.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 315 inserted the third sentence in subsection A.

§ 59.1-545.
Application review.

After announcement of a periodic zone designation application process, the Department shall review each application upon receipt and secure any additional information that it deems necessary for the purpose of evaluating the need and potential impact
of a zone designation.

The Department shall complete review of the applications within 60 days of the last date designated for receipt of an application. After review of the applications the Director of the Department shall recommend to the Governor those applications with
the greatest potential for accomplishing the purpose of this chapter. If an application is denied, the governing body shall be informed of that fact, along with the reasons for the denial.

Consideration for enterprise zone designations shall be based upon the locality-wide need and impact of such a designation. Need shall be assessed in part by the following distress factors: (i) the average unemployment rate for the locality over the most
recent three-year period, (ii) the average median adjusted gross income for the locality over the most recent three-year period, and (iii) the average percentage of public school students within the locality receiving free or reduced
price lunches over the most recent three-year period. These distress factors shall account for at least 50 percent of the consideration given to local governments’ applications for enterprise zone designation.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reversion of city. —

A county may establish a local enterprise zone development taxation program in an enterprise zone located in a town within the county, where the town was a city when the enterprise zone was first established, and the city has since reverted to the status
of a town. See opinion of Attorney General to Patrick J. Skelley II, Esquire, Bedford County Attorney, 16-026, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 29 (11/17/16).

§ 59.1-546.
Review and termination of enterprise zones.

If the local governing body is unable or unwilling to provide the specified local incentives as proposed in its application for zone designation or as approved by the Department in an amendment, the zone designation shall terminate. Qualified business
firms located in such enterprise zone shall be eligible to receive the incentives provided by this chapter even though the zone designation has terminated. No business firm may become a qualified business firm after the date of
zone termination.

If no business firms have qualified for incentives as provided for in this chapter within a five-year period, the Department shall terminate that enterprise zone designation.

The Department shall review the effectiveness in creating jobs and capital investment and activity occurring within designated enterprise zones and shall annually report its findings to the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee
on Commerce and Labor, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Labor and Commerce.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Labor and Commerce” for “Senate
Finance Committee, the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Committee on Commerce and Labor.” March 10, 2021.

§ 59.1-547.
Enterprise zone job creation grants.

As used in this section:“Base year” means either of the two calendar years immediately preceding a qualified business firm’s first year of grant eligibility, at the choice of the business firm.“Federal minimum wage” means the minimum wage standard as
currently defined by the United States Department of Labor in the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq. Such definition applies to permanent full-time employees paid on an hourly or wage basis. For those permanent full-time
employees filling permanent full-time, salaried positions, the minimum wage is defined as the employee’s annual salary divided by 52 weeks per year divided by 35 hours per week.“Full month” means the number of days that a permanent
full-time position must be filled in order to count in the calculation of the job creation grant amount. A full month is calculated by dividing the total number of days in the calendar year by 12. A full month for the purpose of
calculating job creation grants is equivalent to 30.416666 days.“Grant eligible position” means a new permanent full-time position created above the threshold number at an eligible business firm. Positions in retail, personal service
or food and beverage service shall not be considered grant eligible positions.“Minimum wage” means the federal minimum wage or the Virginia minimum wage, whichever is higher. The Department shall determine whichever is higher for
the current calendar year as of December 1 of the prior calendar year, and its determination shall be continuously in effect throughout the calendar year, regardless of changes to the federal minimum wage or the Virginia minimum
wage during that year.“Permanent full-time position” means a job of indefinite duration at a business firm located within an enterprise zone requiring the employee to report for work within the enterprise zone; and requiring (i)
a minimum of 35 hours of an employee’s time per week for the entire normal year of the business firm’s operation, which “normal year” must consist of at least 48 weeks, (ii) a minimum of 35 hours of an employee’s time per week
for the portion of the calendar year in which the employee was initially hired for or transferred to the business firm, or (iii) a minimum of 1,680 hours per year. Such position shall not include (i) seasonal, temporary or contract
positions, (ii) a position created when a job function is shifted from an existing location in the Commonwealth to a business firm located within an enterprise zone, (iii) any position that previously existed in the Commonwealth,
or (iv) positions created by a business that is simultaneously closing facilities in other areas of the Commonwealth.“Qualified business firm” means a business firm designated as a qualified business firm by the Department pursuant
to § 59.1-542.“Report to work” means that the employee filling a permanent full-time position reports to the business’ zone establishment on a regular basis.“Subsequent base year” means the base year for calculating the number
of grant eligible positions in a second or subsequent five consecutive calendar year grant period. If a second or subsequent five-year grant period is requested within two years after the previous five-year grant period, the subsequent
base year will be the last grant year. The calculation of this subsequent base year employment will be determined by the number of permanent full-time positions in the preceding base year, plus the number of threshold positions,
plus the number of grant eligible positions in the final year of the previous grant period. If a business firm applies for subsequent five consecutive calendar year grant periods beyond the two years immediately following the completion
of the previous five-year grant period, the business firm shall use one of the two preceding calendar years as the subsequent base year, at the choice of the business firm.“Threshold number” means an increase of four permanent
full-time positions over the number of permanent full-time positions in the base year or subsequent base year.“Virginia minimum wage” means the applicable minimum wage as determined pursuant to the Virginia Minimum Wage Act (§

40.1-28.8

et seq.).

A business firm shall be eligible to receive enterprise zone job creation grants for any and all years in which the business firm qualifies in the five consecutive calendar years period commencing with the first year of grant eligibility. A business firm
may be eligible for subsequent five consecutive calendar year grant periods if it creates new grant eligible positions above the threshold for its subsequent base year.

The amount of the grant for which a business firm is eligible shall be calculated as follows:

Either (i) $800 per year for up to five consecutive years for each grant eligible position that during such year is paid a minimum of 175 percent of the minimum wage and that is provided with health benefits, or (ii) $500 per year for up to five years
for each grant eligible position that during such year is paid less than 175 percent of the minimum wage, but at least 150 percent of the minimum wage, and that is provided with health benefits. In areas with an unemployment
rate that is one and one-half times or more the state average, or for businesses that are certified under regulations adopted by the Director of the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity pursuant to subdivision
8 of §

2.2-1606

, the business firm will receive $500 per year for up to five years for each grant eligible position that during such year is paid at least 125 percent of the minimum wage and that is provided with health
benefits. Unemployment rates used to determine eligibility for the reduced wage rate threshold shall be based on the most recent annualized unemployment data published by the Virginia Employment Commission. A business firm
may receive grants for up to a maximum of 350 grant eligible jobs annually.

Positions paying less than 150 percent of the minimum wage or that are not provided with health benefits shall not be eligible for enterprise zone job creation grants.

Job creation grants shall be based on a calendar year. The amount of the grant for which a qualified business firm is eligible with respect to any permanent full-time position that is filled for less than a full calendar year shall be prorated based on
the number of full months worked.

The amount of the job creation grant for which a qualified business firm is eligible in any year shall not include amounts for grant eligible positions in any year other than the preceding calendar year. Job creation grants shall not be available for
any calendar year prior to 2005.

Permanent full-time positions that have been used to qualify for any other enterprise zone incentive pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act (former § 59.1-270 et seq.) shall not be eligible for job creation grants and shall not be counted as a part of the
minimum threshold of four new positions.

Any qualified business firm receiving a major business facility job tax credit pursuant to §

58.1-439

shall not be eligible to receive an enterprise zone job creation grant under this section for any job used to qualify for the major business facility job tax credit.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884; 2006, c. 668; 2010, c. 328; 2012, c. 445; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 402.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 445, cl. 2, provides: “That the amendment to §

58.1-439

of the Code of Virginia pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, and the amendment to § 59.1-547 of the Code of Virginia pursuant to the provisions
of this act shall be effective beginning with the 2012 grant year for enterprise zone job creation grants.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 115, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Out of the amounts in this Item, $14,500,000 the first year and $14,750,000 the second year from the general fund shall
be provided to carry out the provisions of §§ 59.1-547 and 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, related to the Enterprise Zone Grant Act. Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 59.1-547 and 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, the department is authorized
to prorate, with no payment of the unpaid portion of the grant necessary in the next fiscal year, the amount of awards each business receives to match the appropriation for this Item. Should actual grants awarded in each fiscal year
be less than the amounts provided in this Item, the excess shall not revert to the general fund but shall be deposited to the Virginia Removal or Rehabilitation of Derelict Structures Fund for revitalization purposes. Consistent with
the provisions of § 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, beginning on January 1, 2019, the installation of solar panels shall be considered eligible investments for the purposes of the real property improvement grants, provided that such solar
installation investment is in an amount of at least $50,000 and the grant shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of qualified real property investments in excess of $450,000 in the case of the construction of a new
building or facility. Grants shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of qualified real property investment in excess of $50,000 in the case of the rehabilitation or expansion of an existing building or facility. In
the case where a grant is awarded based solely on a solar investment, the grant shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of total qualified real property investments made in solar installation. For such properties
eligible for real property improvement grants made solely on the basis of solar installation investments of at least $50,000 but not more than $100,000, awards shall not exceed $1,000,000 in aggregate in any fiscal year.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 402, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 668 substituted “personal” for “local” in the second sentence of the paragraph defining “Grant eligible position.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 328 inserted the second and third sentences of subdivision C 1.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 445 rewrote subsection G, which formerly read: “Any qualified business firm receiving an enterprise zone job creation grant under this section shall not be eligible for a major business facility job tax credit pursuant to §

58.1-439

.” For applicability provision, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 402, effective January 1, 2022, in subsection A, inserted the definitions for “Minimum wage” and “Virginia minimum wage”; and in subsection C, deleted “federal” preceding “minimum wage” throughout and substituted
“175” for “200” twice, “150” for “175” twice, and “125” for “150”; and inserted “or for businesses that are certified under regulations adopted by the Director of the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity pursuant to
subdivision 8 of §

2.2-1606

” in subdivision C 1.

§ 59.1-548.
Enterprise zone real property investment grants.

As used in this section:“Facility” means a complex of buildings, co-located at a single physical location within an enterprise zone, all of which are necessary to facilitate the conduct of the same trade or business. This definition applies to new construction
as well as to the rehabilitation and expansion of existing structures.“Mixed use” means a building incorporating residential uses in which a minimum of 30 percent of the useable floor space will be devoted to commercial, office
or industrial use.“Qualified real property investment” means the amount expended for improvements to rehabilitate, expand or construct depreciable real property placed in service during the calendar year within an enterprise zone
provided that the total amount of such improvements equals or exceeds (i) $100,000 with respect to a single building or a facility in the case of rehabilitation or expansion or (ii) $500,000 with respect to a single building or
a facility in the case of new construction. “Qualified real property investment” includes any such expenditure regardless of whether it is considered properly chargeable to a capital account or deductible as a business expense
under federal Treasury Regulations.Qualified real property investments include expenditures associated with (a) any exterior, interior, structural, mechanical or electrical improvements necessary to construct, expand or rehabilitate
a building for commercial, industrial or mixed use; (b) excavations; (c) grading and paving; (d) installing driveways; and (e) landscaping or land improvements. Qualified real property investments shall include, but not be limited
to, costs associated with demolition, carpentry, sheetrock, plaster, painting, ceilings, fixtures, doors, windows, fire suppression systems, roofing, flashing, exterior repair, cleaning and cleanup.Qualified real property investment
shall not include:

The cost of acquiring any real property or building.

Other costs including: (i) the cost of furnishings; (ii) any expenditure associated with appraisal, architectural, engineering, surveying, and interior design fees; (iii) loan fees, points, or capitalized interest; (iv) legal, accounting, realtor, sales
and marketing, or other professional fees; (v) closing costs, permits, user fees, zoning fees, impact fees, and inspection fees; (vi) bids, insurance, signage, utilities, bonding, copying, rent loss, or temporary facilities
incurred during construction; (vii) utility connection or access fees; (viii) outbuildings; (ix) the cost of any well or septic or sewer system; and (x) roads.

The basis of any property: (i) for which a grant under this section was previously provided; (ii) for which a tax credit under § 59.1-280.1 was previously granted; (iii) which was previously placed in service in Virginia by the qualified zone investor,
a related party as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 267 (b), or a trade or business under common control as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 52 (b); or (iv) which was previously in service in Virginia and has a basis
in the hands of the person acquiring it, determined in whole or in part by reference to the basis of such property in the hands of the person from whom it was acquired or Internal Revenue Code § 1014 (a).“Qualified zone
investor” means an owner or tenant of real property located within an enterprise zone who expands, rehabilitates or constructs such real property for commercial, industrial or mixed use. In the case of a tenant, the amounts
of qualified zone investment specified in this section shall relate to the proportion of the building or facility for which the tenant holds a valid lease. In the case of an owner of an individual unit within a horizontal
property regime, the amounts of qualified zone investments specified in this section shall relate to that proportion of the building for which the owner holds title and not to common elements.

Grants shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of qualified real property investment in excess of $500,000 in the case of the construction of a new building or facility. Grants shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount
of qualified real property investment in excess of $100,000 in the case of the rehabilitation or expansion of an existing building or facility. For any qualified zone investor making $5 million or less in qualified real property
investment, a real property investment grant shall not exceed $100,000 within any five-year period for any individual building or facility. For any qualified zone investor making more than $5 million in qualified real property
investment, a real property investment grant shall not exceed $200,000 within any five-year period for any individual building or facility.

A qualified zone investor shall apply for a real property investment grant in the calendar year following the year in which the property was placed in service.

History.
2005, cc. 863, 884; 2007, cc. 242, 287; 2009, cc. 207, 271; 2017, c. 451.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 242 and 287, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to real property investment grants approved on or after July 1, 2007, by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to Chapter 49 (§ 59.1-538 et
seq.) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2009, cc. 207 and 271, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§ 59.1-548 and 59.1-549 of the Code of Virginia shall be applicable for calendar year 2009 and for each calendar year thereafter.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 115, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Out of the amounts in this Item, $14,500,000 the first year and $14,750,000 the second year from the general fund shall
be provided to carry out the provisions of §§ 59.1-547 and 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, related to the Enterprise Zone Grant Act. Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 59.1-547 and 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, the department is authorized
to prorate, with no payment of the unpaid portion of the grant necessary in the next fiscal year, the amount of awards each business receives to match the appropriation for this Item. Should actual grants awarded in each fiscal year
be less than the amounts provided in this Item, the excess shall not revert to the general fund but shall be deposited to the Virginia Removal or Rehabilitation of Derelict Structures Fund for revitalization purposes. Consistent with
the provisions of § 59.1-548, Code of Virginia, beginning on January 1, 2019, the installation of solar panels shall be considered eligible investments for the purposes of the real property improvement grants, provided that such solar
installation investment is in an amount of at least $50,000 and the grant shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of qualified real property investments in excess of $450,000 in the case of the construction of a new
building or facility. Grants shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of qualified real property investment in excess of $50,000 in the case of the rehabilitation or expansion of an existing building or facility. In
the case where a grant is awarded based solely on a solar investment, the grant shall be calculated at a rate of 20 percent of the amount of total qualified real property investments made in solar installation. For such properties
eligible for real property improvement grants made solely on the basis of solar installation investments of at least $50,000 but not more than $100,000, awards shall not exceed $1,000,000 in aggregate in any fiscal year.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 242 and 287 are identical, and substituted “$5 million” for “2 million” and “20 percent” for “30 percent” in the first and second sentences of subsection B; and deleted the former second sentence of subsection C, pertaining
to real property investments placed in service during 2004.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 207 and 271 are identical, and in the definition of “Qualified real property investment,” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, substituted “$100,000” for “$50,000” at the beginning of clause (i) and “$500,000” for “$250,000”
at the beginning of clause (ii) and deleted “acquisition” following “Other” at the beginning of subdivision 2; in the definition of “Qualified zone investor,” substituted “building or facility” for “property” in the next-to-last sentence
and added the last sentence; and rewrote subsection B. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 451, in subsection A, in the definition for “Qualified real property investment” substituted “expended” for “properly chargeable to a capital account” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.